District of Columbia statutes.
28:3-604

Discharge by cancellation or renunciation.

(a)

A person entitled to enforce an instrument, with or without consideration, may discharge the obligation of a party to pay the instrument (i) by an intentional voluntary act, such as surrender of the instrument to the party, destruction, mutilation, or cancellation of the instrument, cancellation or striking out of the party’s signature, or the addition of words to the instrument indicating discharge, or (ii) by agreeing not to sue or otherwise renouncing rights against the party by a signed record.

(b)

Cancellation or striking out of an indorsement pursuant to subsection (a) of this section does not affect the status and rights of a party derived from the indorsement.

(c)

In this section, “signed”, with respect to a record that is not a writing, includes the attachment to or logical association with the record of an electronic symbol, sound, or process with the present intent to adopt or accept the record.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 692, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-249, § 2(d), 42 DCR 467
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 5(m), 60 DCR 2634
1981 Ed., § 28:3-604.
1973 Ed., § 28:3-605.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-299 substituted “record” for “writing” in (a); and added (c).
Section 3-604 replaces former Section 3-605.